apertium-en-it.it.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 3
	Entries: 7993
	Sdefs: 72
	Paradigms: 513

-->
  <dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
		<sdef n="acr" /> 
		<sdef n="predet" /> 
		<sdef n="detnt" /> 
		<sdef n="loc" /> 
		<sdef n="pron" /> 
		<sdef n="cog" /> 
		<sdef n="ant" /> 
		<sdef n="al" /> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="auxser" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="GD" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="ND" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="preadv" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rel" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="an" /> 
		<sdef n="aa" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="itg" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="dem" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="vbser" /> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="pp" /> 
		<sdef n="pri" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pii" /> 
		<sdef n="ifi" /> 
		<sdef n="fti" /> 
		<sdef n="cni" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="pis" /> 
		<sdef n="fts" /> 
		<sdef n="imp" /> 
		<sdef n="pos" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="ref" /> 
		<sdef n="sup" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="ij" /> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
		<sdef n="cm" /> 
		<sdef n="lpar" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="lquest" /> 
		<sdef n="web" /> 
		<sdef n="apos" /> 
		<sdef n="guio" /> 
		<sdef n="ord" /> 
		<sdef n="time" /> 
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
	<re>[’'‘]</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="apos"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
	<re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="num"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
	<re>[.\?;:!]</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="sent"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>


 <pardef n="hora">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9][0-9]?:[0-9][0-9]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="time"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
	<re>,</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="cm"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
	<re>[¿¡]</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
	<re>[\(\[]</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
	<re>[\)\]]</re>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__cantandomi">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>gli</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


   <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>la</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__cantandoti">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>mi</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ci</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>gli</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>la</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__cantandosi">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>mi</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ci</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ti</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>vi</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>gli</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>la</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="S__cantarglie">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>la</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ne</l>
	  <r>ne<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

 <!-- <pardef n="S__cantarsi">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>le</l>
	  <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>la</l>
	  <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>li</l>
	  <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>lo</l>
	  <r>lo<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef> -->

  <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
  <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
  <e><par n="separ"/></e>
  <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
  <e><par n="coma"/></e>
  <e><par n="separa"/></e>
  <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
